North Dakota statutes. TITLE 54 State Government
CHAPTER 54-24.4 Library Coordinating Council

54-24.4-01.
North Dakota library coordinating council — Members — Term.

The North Dakota library coordinating council consists of eleven members. The president of the North Dakota library association, or the president’s designee, is an ex officio voting member of the council. The state librarian is an ex officio nonvoting member of the council. The governor shall appoint nine members to the council; one of whom must represent a public or private higher education institution library; two of whom must represent libraries at large; one of whom must represent school libraries; two of whom must represent public libraries; one of whom must represent disabled, economically disadvantaged, and minority populations; and two must be citizens at large. All appointed members, except citizens at large, must be practicing librarians. The governor shall take into account reasonable geographic considerations when appointing members of the council. The term of each member is three years. If at any time during a member’s term the member ceases to possess the qualifications required by this section, the member’s office is deemed vacant, and the governor shall appoint a qualified representative to complete the term of office. No member may be appointed to serve more than two consecutive three-year terms.

Source:

S.L. 1997, ch. 453, § 19; 2001, ch. 486, § 1; 2005, ch. 493, § 1; 2015, ch. 380, § 1, effective August 1, 2015; 2021, ch. 407, § 1, effective August 1, 2021.

Effective Date.

The 2015 amendment of this section by section 1 of chapter 380, S.L. 2015 became effective August 1, 2015.

54-24.4-02.
North Dakota library coordinating council — Compensation and expense reimbursement.

Each member of the North Dakota library coordinating council is entitled to receive as compensation sixty-two dollars and fifty cents per day, together with expenses as provided in sections 44-08-04 and 54-06-09, while attending meetings or performing duties directed by the council. No compensation may be paid under this section to any council member who receives compensation as a regular state official or employee.

Source:

S.L. 1997, ch. 453, § 19; 1997, ch. 432, § 27.

54-24.4-03.
North Dakota library coordinating council — Meetings.

The North Dakota library coordinating council shall hold at least one meeting each calendar year for the purpose of awarding grants or contracts. The council shall give notice to the press and the public of any council meeting at least thirty days in advance of the meeting. Awarding of any grant or contract requires approval by two-thirds of the members of the council.

Source:

S.L. 1997, ch. 453, § 19.

54-24.4-04.
North Dakota library coordinating council — Powers.

The North Dakota library coordinating council may elect from its members an executive committee to assist it in performing its duties. The council, in consultation with the state librarian, may request assistance from the staff of the state library in performing its powers and duties.

Source:

S.L. 1997, ch. 453, § 19.

54-24.4-05.
North Dakota library coordinating council — Duties.

The North Dakota library coordinating council shall:

Assist in planning, coordinating, and evaluating the services and programs of libraries in the state.

Serve as the state advisory council on libraries as required by Public Law No. 101-254.

Approve the distribution of grants to libraries, except for grants distributed under chapter 54-24.2.

Facilitate the development of a comprehensive statewide online library catalog, promote statewide resource sharing, and encourage electronic networking among all types of libraries.

Strengthen the state library in its role of coordinating and enriching library service in the state.

Support and strengthen library cooperative ventures, including consortia, regional associations, and partnerships, in their role of extending and improving library services in the state.

Promote equitable access to information resources and library services to persons throughout the state.

Promote the services of libraries and librarians.

Take action necessary to carry out chapter 54-24.3 and this chapter.

Source:

S.L. 1997, ch. 453, § 19; 2005, ch. 493, § 2.